California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Following the adoption of the resolution establishing the district pursuant to Section 36716 or 36717, the clerk shall record a notice and an assessment diagram pursuant to Section 3114. If the assessment is levied on businesses, the text of the recorded notice shall be modified to reflect that the assessment will be levied on businesses, or specified categories of businesses, within the area of the district. No other provision of Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 3100) applies to an assessment district created pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 40.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

36719.

The city council may establish one or more separate benefit zones within the district based upon the degree of benefit derived from the improvements or activities to be provided within the benefit zone and may impose different assessments within each benefit zone. If the assessment is to be levied on businesses, the city council may also define categories of businesses based upon the degree of benefit that each will derive from the improvements or activities to be provided within the district and may impose different assessments or rates of assessment on each category of business, or on each category of business within each zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36720.

The city council may levy assessments on businesses or on property owners, or a combination of the two, pursuant to this part. The city council shall structure the assessments in whatever manner it determines corresponds with the distribution of benefits from the proposed improvements and activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36721.

All provisions of this part applicable to the establishment, modification, or disestablishment of a district apply to the establishment, modification, or disestablishment of benefit zones or categories of business. The city council shall, to establish, modify, or disestablish a benefit zone or category of business, follow the procedure to establish, modify, or disestablish a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36722.

If a district expires due to the time limit set pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 36713, a new management district plan may be created and a new district established pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Assessments [36730. - 36737.]

36730.

The collection of the assessments levied pursuant to this part shall be made at the time and in the manner set forth by the city council in the resolution establishing the management district plan described in Section 36713. Assessments levied on real property may be collected at the same time and in the same manner as for the ad valorem property tax, and may provide for the same lien priority and penalties for delinquent payment. All delinquent payments for assessments levied pursuant to this part shall be charged interest and penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36731.

(a) The assessments levied on real property pursuant to this part shall be levied on the basis of the estimated benefit to the real property within the district. The city council may classify properties for purposes of determining the benefit to property of the improvements and activities provided pursuant to this part.

(b) Assessments levied on businesses pursuant to this part shall be levied on the basis of the estimated benefit to the businesses within the district. The city council may classify businesses for purposes of determining the benefit to the businesses of the improvements and activities provided pursuant to this part.

(c) Properties used for single-family residential use, or that are zoned for agricultural use, are conclusively presumed not to benefit from the improvements and service funded through these assessments, and shall not be subject to any assessment pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36732.

The validity of an assessment levied under this part shall not be contested in any action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the resolution levying the assessment is adopted pursuant to Section 36717. Any appeal from a final judgment in an action or proceeding shall be perfected within 30 days after the entry of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36733.

The city council may execute baseline service contracts that would establish levels of city services that would continue after a district has been formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 191.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

36734.

The owners’ association may, at any time, request that the city council modify the management district plan. Any modification of the management district plan shall be made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36735.

(a) Upon the written request of the owners’ association, the city council may modify the management district plan after conducting one public hearing on the proposed modifications. The city council may modify the improvements and activities to be funded with the revenue derived from the levy of the assessments by adopting a resolution determining to make the modifications after holding a public hearing on the proposed modifications. If the modification includes the levy of a new or increased assessment, the city council shall comply with Section 36714. Notice of all other public meetings and public hearings pursuant to this section shall comply with both of the following:

(1) The resolution of intention shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the city once at least seven days before the public meeting.

(2) A complete copy of the resolution of intention shall be mailed by first class mail, at least 10 days before the public meeting, to each business owner or property owner affected by the proposed modification.

(b) The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention which states the proposed modification prior to the public hearing required by this section. The public hearing shall be held not more than 90 days after the adoption of the resolution of intention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 114, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

36736.

Any subsequent modification of the resolution shall be reflected in subsequent notices and maps recorded pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 3100), in a manner consistent with the provisions of Section 36718.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36737.

(a) The city council may, by resolution, determine and declare that bonds shall be issued to finance the estimated cost of some or all of the proposed improvements described in the resolution of formation adopted pursuant to Section 36716, if the resolution of formation adopted pursuant to that section provides for the issuance of bonds, under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500)) or in conjunction with Marks-Roos Local Bond Pooling Act of 1985 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code). Either act, as the case may be, shall govern the proceedings relating to the issuance of bonds, although proceedings under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 may be modified by the city council as necessary to accommodate assessments levied upon business pursuant to this part.

(b) The resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall generally describe the proposed improvements specified in the resolution of formation adopted pursuant to Section 36716, set forth the estimated cost of those improvements, specify the number of annual installments and the fiscal years during which they are to be collected. The amount of debt service to retire the bonds shall not exceed the amount of revenue estimated to be raised from assessments over 20 years.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, assessments levied to pay the principal and interest on any bond issued pursuant to this section shall not be reduced or terminated if doing so would interfere with the timely retirement of the debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 192.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Governance [36740. - 36745.]

36740.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, an owners’ association shall comply with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), at all times when matters within the subject matter of the district are heard, discussed, or deliberated, and with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), for all documents relating to activities of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 421.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

36741.

(a) The owners’ association shall cause to be prepared a report for each fiscal year, except the first year, for which assessments are to be levied and collected to pay the costs of the improvements and activities described in the report. The owners’ association’s first report shall be due after the first year of operation of the district. The report may propose changes, including, but not limited to, the boundaries of the district or any benefit zones within the district, the basis and method of levying the assessments, and any changes in the classification of property, including any categories of business, if a classification is used.

(b) The report shall be filed with the clerk and shall refer to the district by name, specify the fiscal year to which the report applies, and, with respect to that fiscal year, shall contain all of the following information:

(1) Any proposed changes in the boundaries of the district or in any benefit zones or classification of property or businesses within the district.

(2) The improvements and activities to be provided for that fiscal year.

(3) An estimate of the cost of providing the improvements and the activities for that fiscal year.

(4) The method and basis of levying the assessment in sufficient detail to allow each real property or business owner, as appropriate, to estimate the amount of the assessment to be levied against his or her property or business for that fiscal year.

(5) The amount of any surplus or deficit revenues to be carried over from a previous fiscal year.

(6) The amount of any contributions to be made from sources other than assessments levied pursuant to this part.

(c) The city council may approve the report as filed by the owners’ association or may modify any particular contained in the report and approve it as modified. Any modification shall be made pursuant to Sections 36734 and 36735.

(d) The city council shall not approve a change in the basis and method of levying assessments that would impair an authorized or executed contract to be paid from the revenues derived from the levy of assessments, including any commitment to pay principal and interest on any bonds issued on behalf of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36742.

The management district plan may, but is not required to, state that an owners’ association will provide the improvements or activities described in the management district plan. If the management district plan designates an owners’ association, the city shall contract with the designated nonprofit corporation to provide services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36743.

(a) Any district previously established whose term has expired, may be renewed by following the procedures for establishment as provided in this chapter.

(b) Upon renewal, any remaining revenues derived from the levy of assessments, or any revenues derived from the sale of assets acquired with the revenues, shall be transferred to the renewed district. If the renewed district includes additional parcels or businesses not included in the prior district, the remaining revenues shall be spent to benefit only the parcels or the businesses in the prior district. If the renewed district does not include parcels or the businesses included in the prior district, the remaining revenues attributable to these parcels shall be refunded to the owners of these parcels or businesses.

(c) Upon renewal, a district shall have a term not to exceed 10 years. There is no requirement that the boundaries, assessments, improvements, or activities of a renewed district be the same as the original or prior district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36744.

(a) Any district established or extended pursuant to the provisions of this part, where there is no indebtedness, outstanding and unpaid, incurred to accomplish any of the purposes of the district, may be disestablished by resolution by the city council in either of the following circumstances:

(1) If the city council finds there has been a misappropriation of funds, malfeasance, or a violation of law in connection with the management of the district, it shall notice a hearing on disestablishment.

(2) During the operation of the district, there shall be a 30-day period each year in which assessees may request disestablishment of the district. The first such period shall begin one year after the date of establishment of the district and shall continue for 30 days. The next such 30-day period shall begin two years after the date of the establishment of the district. Each successive year of operation of the district shall have such a 30-day period. Upon the written petition of the owners of real property or of businesses in the area who pay 50 percent or more of the assessments levied, the city council shall pass a resolution of intention to disestablish the district. The city council shall give notice of the public hearing on the proposed disestablishment.

(b) The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to disestablish the district prior to the public hearing required by this section. The resolution shall state the reason for the disestablishment, shall state the time and place of the public hearing, and shall contain a proposal to dispose of any assets acquired with the revenues of the assessments levied within the district. The notice of the hearing on the proposed disestablishment required by this section shall be given by mail to the property owner of each parcel or to the owner of each business subject to assessment in the district, as appropriate. The city shall conduct the public hearing not less than 30 days after mailing the notice to the property or business owners. The public hearing shall be held not more than 60 days after the adoption of the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36745.

(a) Upon the disestablishment of a district, any remaining revenues, after all outstanding debts are paid, derived from the levy of assessments, or derived from the sale of assets acquired with the revenues, or from bond reserve or construction funds, shall be refunded to the owners of the property or businesses then located and operating within the district in which assessments were levied by applying the same method and basis that was used to calculate the assessments levied in the fiscal year in which the district is disestablished. All outstanding assessment revenue collected after disestablishment shall be spent on improvements and activities specified in the management district plan.

(b) If the disestablishment occurs before an assessment is levied for the fiscal year, the method and basis that was used to calculate the assessments levied in the immediate prior fiscal year shall be used to calculate the amount of any refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

